Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-901.06
Bailable defendant; duty of court to inform of rights and duties.

When a bailable defendant appears at any judicial proceeding in which such defendant's bail is being considered, the judge at such proceeding shall inform the defendant of the condition or conditions imposed on his release, the penalties for violating any of the conditions of such release, and any options or alternatives available to such defendant.

Laws 1974, LB 828, § 7.

Court when releasing a defendant on bond need only inform defendant of special or unusual condition of his bail attached thereto and no duty exists to inform the defendant of obvious condition to return to the court as ordered nor inform defendant of possible penalty for failure to appear. State v. King, 214 Neb. 855, 336 N.W.2d 576 (1983).